Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-1209
Contract provisions; void.

The following
provisions in any contract or subcontract for construction work performed
within the State of Nebraska shall be against public policy and shall be void
and unenforceable:

(1) A provision
that purports to waive, release, or extinguish rights to file a claim against
a payment or performance bond, except that a contract or subcontract may require
a contractor or subcontractor to provide a waiver or release of such rights
as a condition for payment, but only to the extent of the amount of the payment
received;

(2) A provision that purports to make any state law other than that
of Nebraska applicable to or governing any contract for construction within
the state; or

(3) A provision that purports to require that the venue for a court
or arbitration hearing be held at any location outside of the state.

Laws 2010, LB552, § 9.